Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.100

Notice of sale—Requirements of.

The notice of sale of county property by auction sale must particularly describe the property to be sold and designate the day and hour and the location of the auction sale. The notice of sale of county property by sealed bid must describe the property to be sold, designate the date and time after which the bids are not received, the location to turn in the sealed bid, and the date, time, and location of the public meeting of the county legislative authority when the bids are opened and read in public.

[ 1991 c 363 s 70; 1963 c 4 s 36.34.100. Prior: 1945 c 254 s 9; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 4014-9; prior: 1891 c 76 s 4, part; RRS s 4010, part.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.